src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Multichar_Symbols and *Root* lexicon for Veps 

## Miscellaneuos tags

* **+TYÄ** 
* **+Span** 

Thes are  to be evaluated (are they in use?)
TODO: Have a look at these: 

* **+Arab** 
* **+CLBfinal** 
* **+Cmp** 
* **+CmpNP/First** 
* **+CmpNP/None** 
* **+Cmp/SplitR** 
* **+Cmp/Hyph** 
* **+Coll** 
* **+Com** 
* **+Err/Hyph** 
* **+Err/Lex** 
* **+Err/SpaceCmp** 
* **+Err/MissingSpace** 
* **+MWE** 
* **+OLang/ENG** 
* **+OLang/FIN** 
* **+OLang/NNO** 
* **+OLang/NOB** 
* **+OLang/RUS** 
* **+OLang/SMA** 
* **+OLang/SME** 
* **+OLang/SWE** 
* **+OLang/UND** 
* **+Prf** 
* **+PrfPrs** 
* **+Rom** 

* **+Use/-PMatch** 
* **+Use/Circ** 
* **+Use/NG** do not generate
* **+Use/GC** ??? typo?, occurs once.
* **+Use/PMatch** 
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg**
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

* **+Hom1**
* **+Hom2**
* **+Hom3**

* **+v1** 
* **+v2** 
* **+v3** 
* **+v4** 
* **@C.ErrOrth@** 
* **@D.ErrOrth.ON@** 
* **@P.ErrOrth.ON@** 
* **@R.ErrOrth.ON@** 

* **@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@**

* **@P.Pmatch.Loc@**

## Grammatical tags 

The morphological analyses of wordforms of Veps are presented 
in this system in terms of the following symbols. 
(It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags). 

### The parts-of-speech 
* **+A**  = adjective 
* **+Adp**  = adposition 
* **+Adv**  = adverb 
* **+CS**  = subordinating conjunction 
* **+CC**  = coordinating conjunction
* **+Det**  = determiner
* **+Interj**  = interjection 
* **+N**  = noun 
* **+Num**  = numeral 
* **+Pcle**  = particle 
* **+Pr**  = preposition 
* **+Po**  = postposition 
* **+Pron**  = pronoun 
* **+Qnt**  = quantifier 
* **+V**  = verb 

### Subtags 

### Noun subtags 

* **+Prop**  = proper 

#### Pronoun tags 

* **+Dem**  = demonstrative 
* **+Indef**  = indefinite 
* **+Interr**  = interrogative 
* **+Pers**  = personal 
* **+Recipr**  = reciprocal 
* **+Refl**  = reflexive 
* **+Rel**  = relative 

#### Verb tags 
##### Voice and transitivity

* **+Aux**  = auxiliary verb
* **+Act**  = active voice 
* **+Pss**  = passive voice 
* **+TV** = transitive and
* **+IV**  = intransitive verbs

##### Verb moods are: 

* **+Cond**  = conditional 
* **+Ind**  = indicative 
* **+Imprt**  = imperative
* **+Pot**  = potential linne-

##### Tenses 
* **+Prs**  = 
* **+Prt**  = 
* **+Pos**  = 

##### Verb personal forms are: 

* **+Sg1** Singular First Person 
* **+Sg2** Singular Second Person 
* **+Sg3** Singular Third Person 
* **+Pl1** Plural First Person 
* **+Pl2** Plural Second Person 
* **+Pl3** Plural Third Person 
* **+RcSg1** 
* **+RcSg2** 
* **+RcSg3** 
* **+RcPl1** 
* **+RcPl2** 
* **+RcPl3**  = 
* **+RcSg** 
* **+RcPl** 
* **+ScSg** 
* **+ScPl**  = 

##### Other verb forms are 

* **+Inf** 
* **+Ger** 
* **+Neg**  = 
* **+ConNeg** 
* **+ConNegII**  = 
* **+ImprtII**  = 
* **+PrsPrc** 
* **+PrfPrc**  = nu 
* **+Sup** 
* **+VGen** 
* **+VAbess**  = 

#### Nominal tags

* **+Sg**  = singular 
* **+Pl**  = plural 
* **+Abe**  = abessive 
* **+Acc**  = accusative 
* **+Abl**  = ablative case 
* **+Ade**  = adessive 
* **+All**  = allative 
* **+Dat**  = dative case 
* **+Ela**  = elative 
* **+Ess**  = essive 
* **+Exe**  = essive 
* **+Gen**  = genitive case 
* **+Ill**  = illative 
* **+Ine**  = inessive 
* **+Ins**  = instrumental 
* **+Instr**  = instructive -IN 
* **+Lat**  = Lative 
* **+Loc**  = Locative 
* **+Nom**  = nominative case 
* **+Par**  = partitive 
* **+Prl**  = prolative 
* **+Tra**  = translative 
* **+Voc**  = Vocative 
* **+Pros**  = 
* **+Adc**  = 
* **+Apr**  = 
* **+Egr**  = 
* **+Ter1**  = 
* **+Ter2**  = 
* **+Ter3**  = 
* **+Add1**  = 
* **+Add2**  = 
* **+Apr1**  = 
* **+Apr2**  = 
* **+EssInst**  = 

##### Possessive suffixes: 

* **+PxSg1**  = -in
* **+PxSg2**  =  -iž
* **+PxSg3**  = -ze
* **+PxPl1**  = -moi
* **+PxPl2**  = -toi
* **+PxPl3**  = -ze

##### Comparative tags: 

* **+Comp**  = 
* **+Superl**  = 

#### Subtags for Numerals: 

* **+Attr**  = 
* **+Card**  = 
* **+Ord**  = 

#### ADVERBS 
* **+Manner**  = 
* **+Spat**  = 
* **+Temp**  = 

#### Abbreviated words are classified with: 

* **+ABBR** 
* **+Symbol**  = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, © 
* **+ACR**  = 

#### Special symbols are classified with: 

* **+CLB** 
* **+PUNCT** 
* **+LEFT** 
* **+RIGHT +MIDDLE**  = 

#### Special multiword units are analysed with: 
* **+Multi**  = 

#### Guess tag, used to catch new wores

* **+Guess**  = 

#### Question and Focus particles: 

* **+Qst** 
* **+Foc**  = 
* **+Clt**  = 
* **+Foc/i**  = perhaps +Addative
* **+Foc/ki**  = 
* **+Foc/žo**  = 
* **+Appr**  = 
* **+Advc**  = 
* **+Ter**  = 
* **+Pro**  = 
* **+Car**  = 
* **+PstI**  = 
* **+PstII**  = 

## Error (non-standard language) tags

* **+Err/Orth** substandard, not in normative fst
* **+Err/Orth-no-pal**  = palatalization mark missing

#### Usage tags: 

* **+Use/-Spell** Orthographically correct, typically perifer words, excluded in speller because they cause trouble for frequent words
* **+Use/-PLX** Excluded in PLX-speller
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** recognized but not suggested in speller
* **+Use/Circ** circular paths (old ^C^)
* **+Use/CircN** circular paths for the numerals (old ^N^)
* **+Use/MT** Generate for MT only, for restricting analyses needed
for MT generation not to pop up elsewhere (NOT IN FUNCTION)
* **+Use/NG** not-generate, for ped generation isme-ped.fst and MT
* **+Use/NGminip** Not for miniparadigm in NDS dicts
* **+Use/PMatch** means that the following is only used in the analyser feeding the disambiguator
* **+Use/-PMatch** Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

* **+Cmp/SgNom**  = compound words

#### Semtags 
* **+Sem/Mal** 
* **+Sem/Fem** 
* **+Sem/Sur**  = 
* **+Sem/Plc**  = 
* **+Sem/Org**  = 
* **+Sem/Obj**  = 
* **+Sem/Ani**  = 
* **+Sem/Hum**  = 
* **+Sem/Plant**  = 
* **+Sem/Group**  = 
* **+Sem/Time**  = 
* **+Sem/Txt**  = 
* **+Sem/Route**  = 
* **+Sem/Measr**  = 
* **+Sem/Wthr**  = 
* **+Sem/Build**  = 
* **+Sem/Edu**  = 
* **+Sem/Veh**  = 
* **+Sem/Clth**  = 

#### More semtags 
* **+Sem/Amount** 
* **+Sem/Build-room** 
* **+Sem/Cat** 
* **+Sem/Curr** 
* **+Sem/Date** 
* **+Sem/Domain** 
* **+Sem/Domain_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Dummytag** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Event** 
* **+Sem/Food-med** 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/ID** 
* **+Sem/Lang** 
* **+Sem/Mat** 
* **+Sem/Money** 
* **+Sem/Obj-el** 
* **+Sem/Obj-ling** 
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-audio** 
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Part** 
* **+Sem/Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Rule** 
* **+Sem/Sign** 
* **+Sem/State** 
* **+Sem/State-sick** 
* **+Sem/Substnc** 
* **+Sem/Time-clock** 
* **+Sem/Tool-it** 
* **+Sem/Year** 

#### Derivations  

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the 
source and target part-of-speech. 

* **+V→N** 
* **+V→V** 
* **+V→A**  = 
* **+Der**  =
* **+Der/NomAg**  = tehta : tegii
* **+Der/Uz1**  = sur»uz' A»N 
* **+Der/Ta**  = 
* **+Der/Te**  = 
* **+Der/ma**  = 
* **+Der/Tu**  = 
* **+Der/IA**  = 
* **+Der/Toi**  = nime»toi N»A 
* **+Der/Matoi**  = V»A 
* **+Der/Mine**  = V»N 
* **+Der/V**  = V»V

### Morphophonology 
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following 
symbols in the lexicon files: 

#### Archiphonemes and fluctuation symbols
* **%{eØ%}**  vowel loss in oiged:oiktan 
* **%{uØ%}**  vowel loss in sapug:sapkan 
* **%{iØ%}**  vowel loss in paltin:paltnan 
* **%{aØ%}**  vowel loss in samal:samlan 
* **%{oØ%}**  vowel loss in zerkol:zerklon 
* **{aä}** 
* **{oö}** 
* **{uü}** 

#### More archiphonemes (Protoletters for xfst)

* **%^DEVOICE**  = haikta: haig
* %^PEN         Control final vs penultimate
* **QAQ1** 
* **QAO1** 
* **QÄQ1** 
* **EH1** 
* **QEQ1** 
* **INE1** 
* **ZD1** 
* **ZS1** 
* **V1** 
* **AO1** 
* **A1** 
* **EI1** 
* **ZS1** 
* **ZD1**  These are for developing underlying morphology rules 
* **D1** 
* **E1** 
* **U1** 
* **I1** 
* **AÄ1** 
* **OÖ1** 
* **UY1** 
* **V1** 
* **V2** 
* **V3** 

#### And following triggers to control variation 

* **{front}** front vowel stems
* **{back}** back vowel stems
* **%^RmVow**  for removing vowels 
* **%^WGStem** 
* **%^TS** 
* **%^RVow** 
* **%^LVow** 
* **%^LCns** 
* **%^WCns** 
* **%^AtoO** 
* **%^ÄtoÖ** 
* **%^OddSyll** 
* **%^StretchSyll2** 
* **%^SyllBr** 
* **%^E1** 

#### Boundary symbols

* **%>**  = 
* **%-**  = 

## Flag diacritics 

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following 
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds 
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again: 

| Flag | Explanation 
| ---- | ----------- 
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@**  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@**  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 
|  **@C.NeedNoun@**  | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised 

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed 
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is 
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will 
do no harm. 

| Flag | Explanation 
| ---- | ----------- 
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@**  | Require that words tagged as such only appear first 
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@**  | Block such words from entering ENDLEX 
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@**  | Block these words from making further compounds 
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@**  | Block such words from entering R 
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@**  | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding 
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@**  | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding 
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@**  | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R 
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@**  | Disallow words coming directly from root. 

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper 
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use 
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing 
given the proper use of these flags. 

| Flag | Explanation 
| ---- | ----------- 
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@**  | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj. 
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@**  | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj. 

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
